Washington statutes.
RCW 2.14.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Plan" means the judicial retirement account plan.

(2) "Principal account" means the judicial retirement principal account.

(3) "Member" means a judge participating in the judicial retirement account plan.

(4) "Administrative account" means the judicial retirement administrative account.

(5) "Accumulated contributions" means the total amount contributed to a member's account under RCW 2.14.090 (1) and (2), together with any interest and earnings that have been credited to the member's account.

[ 1988 c 109 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.